fi: Kaikupedaalin tyyli: Jalkakytkin (kompakti); Pedaaliyksikkö (kosketinsoitintelineelle); Pianotyylinen pedaali (yksittäinen); Kolmen pedaalin yksikkö (integroitu); Muu
zh-TW: 延音踏板樣式: 腳踏開關 (輕巧型); 踏板組 (適用於鍵盤架); 鋼琴式踏板 (單踏板); 三踏板組 (整合式); 其他
hu: Zengető pedál stílusa: Lábkapcsoló (kompakt); Pedálegység (szintetizátorállványhoz); Zongorastílusú pedál (szimpla); Hármas pedálegység (beépített); Egyéb
fr: Style de pédale damper: Pédale commutateur (compacte); Pédalier (pour support de clavier); Pédale de type piano (simple); Triple pédalier (intégré); Autre
cs: Styl tlumicího pedálu: Nožní spínač (kompaktní); Pedálová jednotka (pro stojan kláves); Pedál klavírního typu (samostatný); Trojpedálová jednotka (integrovaná); Jiné
en: Damper pedal style: Footswitch (compact); Pedal unit (for keyboard stand); Piano-style pedal (single); Triple pedal unit (integrated); Other
zh-CN: 延音踏板类型: 踏脚开关（紧凑型）; 踏板单元（用于键盘架）; 钢琴式踏板（单踏板）; 三踏板单元（集成式）; 其他
pl: Styl pedału sustain: Przełącznik nożny (kompaktowy); Moduł pedałów (do statywu klawiszowego); Pedał fortepianowy (pojedynczy); Moduł z trzema pedałami (zintegrowany); Inne
el: Στυλ πεντάλ αμορτισέρ: Ποδοδιακόπτης (συμπαγής); Μονάδα πεντάλ (για βάση αρμονίου); Πεντάλ τύπου πιάνου (μονό); Μονάδα τριπλού πεντάλ (ενσωματωμένη); Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl tlmiaceho pedála: Nožný spínač (kompaktný); Pedálová jednotka (k stojanu na klávesy); Pedál klavírneho typu (jeden); Trojitá pedálová jednotka (integrovaná); Iné
bg-BG: Стил на демпферен педал: Крачен превключвател (компактен); Педали (за стойка на кийборд); Педал тип пиано (единичен); Троен педал (вграден); Други
de: Bauart des Dämpferpedals: Fußschalter (kompakt); Pedaleinheit (für Keyboardständer); Piano-Pedal (einzeln); 3-fach-Pedaleinheit (integriert); Sonstige
hr-HR: Stil pedale prigušivača: Nožni prekidač (kompaktni); Pedalna jedinica (za stalak za klavijaturu); Pedala u klavirskom stilu (pojedinačna); Jedinica s tri pedale (integrirana); Ostalo
es: Estilo del pedal amortiguador: Interruptor de pie (compacto); Unidad de pedal (para soporte de teclado); Pedal tipo piano (sencillo); Unidad de triple pedal (integrada); Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta stopalke za dušenje: Nožno stikalo (kompaktno); Enota s pedali (za stojalo za klaviature); Pedal v slogu klavirja (enojni); Enota s tremi pedali (integrirana); Drugo
ru: Тип педали сустейна: Педаль-переключатель (компактная); Педальный блок (для стойки); Фортепианная педаль (одинарная); Тройной педальный блок (встроенный); Другое
vi: Kiểu bàn đạp giảm âm: Công tắc chân (nhỏ gọn); Bộ bàn đạp (cho giá đỡ bàn phím); Bàn đạp kiểu piano (đơn); Bộ ba bàn đạp (tích hợp); Khác
sv: Dämparpedalstil: Fotpedal (kompakt); Pedalenhet (för klaviaturstativ); Pianopedal (enkel); Trippelpedal (integrerad); Övrigt
lt-LT: Slopinimo pedalo stilius: Kojinis jungiklis (kompaktiškas); Pedalų blokas (klaviatūros stovui); Pianino stiliaus pedalas (pavienis); Trijų pedalų blokas (integruotas); Kita
da: Dæmpers pedalstil: Fodkontakt (kompakt); Pedalenhed (til keyboardstativ); Pianopedal (enkelt); Tredobbelt pedalenhed (integreret); Andet
th: แป้นเหยียบแดมเปอร์: ฟุตสวิตช์ (กะทัดรัด); ชุดเพดดัล (สำหรับขาตั้งคีย์บอร์ด); เพดดัลสไตล์เปียโน (เดี่ยว); ชุดเพดดัล 3 เหยียบ (ในตัว); อื่นๆ
nl: Demperpedaal stijl: Voetschakelaar (compact); Pedaalunit (voor keyboardstandaard); Pedaal in pianostijl (enkel); Drievoudige pedaalunit (geïntegreerd); Overige
it: Pedale smorzatore: Interruttore a pedale (compatto); Unità pedali (per supporto tastiera); Pedale stile pianoforte (singolo); Unità a tre pedali (integrata); Altro
nb: Demperpedalstil: Fotbryter (kompakt); Pedalenhet (for keyboardstativ); Pianopedal (enkel); Trippel pedalenhet (integrert); Annet
ja: ダンパーペダルスタイル: フットスイッチ (コンパクト); ペダルユニット (キーボードスタンド用); ピアノスタイルペダル (シングル); 3本ペダルユニット (一体型); その他
pt-PT: Estilo de pedal amortecedor: Interruptor de pé (compacto); Unidade de pedais (para suporte de teclado); Pedal tipo piano (único); Unidade de três pedais (integrada); Outro
ko: 댐퍼 페달 유형: 풋스위치(컴팩트); 페달 유닛(키보드 스탠드용); 피아노 스타일 페달(싱글); 트리플 페달 유닛(일체형); 기타
tr: Damper pedalı stili: Ayak pedalı (kompakt); Pedal ünitesi (klavye standı için); Piyano tarzı pedal (tekli); Üçlü pedal ünitesi (entegre); Diğer
ro-RO: Stil pedală de amortizor: Comutator de picior (compact); Unitate de pedale (pentru stativ de claviatură); Pedală în stil pian (simplă); Unitate triplă de pedale (integrată); Altele
pt-BR: Estilo de pedal amortecedor: Pedal interruptor (compacto); Unidade de pedais (para suporte de teclado); Pedal estilo piano (simples); Unidade de pedais triplos (integrada); Outro